Missouri, session 2026, HB2009.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
PART 1
Section 9.000. Part 2 of this act shall consist of guidance to the
Department of Corrections in implementing the appropriations
found in Part 1 of this act. An appropriation may be comprised
in whole or in part of a one-time amount, and such one-time
amount shall be construed to be a component part of, and not in
addition to, the stated appropriation amount. Any amount of an
appropriation identified as “one-time” in this act shall not be

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 2
considered an addition to any ongoing core appropriation(s) in
future fiscal periods beyond June 30, 2027. Any amount
identified as one-time may, however, be requested in any future
fiscal period as a new decision item.
Section 9.005. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between sections, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,993,424
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 92,882
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,086,306
Personal Service ....................................................................................................87,021
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,800
From Inmate Fund (1540) .................................................................................................88,821
For Family Support Services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $44,360 one-time) ..............................428,453
From Department of Corrections Federal Fund (1130)
(including $44,360 one-time) ................................................................... 115,384
Total (Not to exceed 109.50 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$7,718,964
Section 9.010. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of Professional Standards, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,883,417
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 250,252
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 50.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$3,133,669
Section 9.015. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For the Offender Reentry Program, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 3
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,100,000
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Fund (1540) ............................................................................................1,731,491
For a 501(c)(3) nonprofit entity to implement open-source data
integration and analytics technology solutions designed to
improve correctional case management system-wide by bridging
the gap between prisons and supervision, support institutional
reentry preparation, and enhance reentry outcomes and reduce
revocations, provided that the Department shall procure services
in compliance with Chapter 34, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................750,000
For a pilot program to engage a nonprofit agency equipped to provide
video job interviewing with vetted second-chance employers,
onboarding assistance, and job coaching to inmates releasing
from state correctional facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 400,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,981,491
Section 9.016. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For funding a program for low-risk offender supervision that monitors
individuals subject to pre-conviction or post-conviction
supervision through a check-in system that the supervising
agency or circuit can access through a secure web-based
platform; a secondary objective is to establish exclusion zones
and compliance levels through a platform capable of generating
relevant reports
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,000,000
Section 9.017. To the Department of Corrections
For reducing recidivism among offenders with serious substance use
disorders who are returning to community areas from any of the
state correctional facilities. Additionally, remaining funds shall
be used to support offenders returning to other regions of the state
who are working with available treatment slots from the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 4
Department of Mental Health. The department shall select a
qualified not-for-profit service provider in accordance with state
purchasing rules. The provider must have experience serving this
population in a correctional setting as well as in the community.
The provider shall design and implement an evidence-based
program that includes a continuum of services from prison to
community, including medication assisted treatment that is
initiated prior to release, when appropriate. The program must
include an evaluation component to determine its effectiveness
relative to other options, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 9.018. To the Department of Corrections
For fentanyl and dangerous narcotics testing of wastewater at statewide
correctional facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 9.020. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General
Assembly, provided the General Assembly shall be notified of
the source of any new funds and the purpose for which they
should be expended, in writing, prior to the use of said funds and
provided sixty percent (60%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,103,770
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,827,287
From Department of Corrections Federal Fund (1130) ...............................................5,931,057
For contributions, gifts, and grants in support of a foster care dog
program to increase the adoptability of shelter animals and train
service dogs for the disabled
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ................................................... 75,000
Total (Not to exceed 43.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,006,057
Section 9.025. To the Department of Corrections

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 5
For the Office of the Director
For Improving Community Treatment services, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
Section 9.030. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For costs associated with supervising the offender population
department-wide, including, but not limited to, funding for
personal service, expense and equipment, contractual services,
repairs, renovations, capital improvements, and compensatory
time, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,486,557
Section 9.035. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For restitution payments for those wrongly convicted, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$58,400
Section 9.040. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For telecommunications department-wide, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,860,529
Section 9.045. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 6
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$14,434,025
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 495,891
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 258.02 F.T.E.) ......................$14,929,916
Section 9.050. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For general services, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between sections, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$744,318
Section 9.055. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For the operation of institutional facilities, utilities, systems furniture,
and structural modifications, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$27,076,165
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................... 1,909,833
Total .........................................................................................................................$28,985,998
Section 9.060. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For the purchase, transportation, and storage of food and food service
items, and operational expenses of food preparation facilities at
all correctional institutions, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed from personal service to expense
and equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,558,823
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 54,494,699
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 60.00 F.T.E.) ........................$57,053,522
Section 9.065. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 7
For training costs department-wide, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,898,340
Section 9.070. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For employee health and safety, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between sections, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$574,964
Section 9.075. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees identified
by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any remaining
funds being used to pay overtime to any other state employees
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285.
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$13,556,871
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................................60,962
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................... 60,962
Total .........................................................................................................................$13,678,795
Section 9.080. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For expenses and small equipment purchased at any of the adult
institutions department-wide, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$30,390,218

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 8
For expenses related to offender education, recreation, and/or religious
services
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 1,200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$31,590,218
Section 9.085. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,015,366
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 106,317
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 61.91 F.T.E.) ..........................$4,121,683
Section 9.090. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For inmate wage and discharge costs at all correctional facilities,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,825,830
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 979,585
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,805,415
Section 9.095. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Jefferson City Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$25,531,325
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 186,991
Total (Not to exceed 504.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$25,718,316
Section 9.100. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 9
For the Women's Eastern Reception, Diagnostic and Correctional Center
at Vandalia, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between institutions and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$16,043,666
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) .................................................................................137,233
For a Prison Nursery Program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed from personal service to expense and equipment and
further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
institutions
Personal Service ..................................................................................................350,339
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 324,074
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................674,413
For a pregnancy and postpartum doula training program within the
Prison Nursery Program
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................30,000
Expense and Equipment
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 168,000
Total (Not to exceed 333.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$17,053,312
Section 9.105. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Ozark Correctional Center at Fordland, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,191,412
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 143,992
Total (Not to exceed 180.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$10,335,404
Section 9.110. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Moberly Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and further provided

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 10
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$19,426,403
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 142,654
Total (Not to exceed 378.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$19,569,057
Section 9.115. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Algoa Correctional Center at Jefferson City, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$14,188,308
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 135,264
Total (Not to exceed 278.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$14,323,572
Section 9.120. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Missouri Eastern Correctional Center at Pacific, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$16,133,138
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 134,605
Total (Not to exceed 324.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$16,267,743
Section 9.125. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Chillicothe Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$20,993,869
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 138,407
Total (Not to exceed 409.02 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$21,132,276

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 11
Section 9.130. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Boonville Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$13,417,453
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 140,326
Total (Not to exceed 275.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$13,557,779
Section 9.135. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Farmington Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$27,826,026
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 142,745
Total (Not to exceed 533.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$27,968,771
Section 9.140. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Potosi Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$17,542,571
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 146,945
Total (Not to exceed 331.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$17,689,516
Section 9.145. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Fulton Reception and Diagnostic Center, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 12
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$19,754,506
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 142,509
Total (Not to exceed 381.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$19,897,015
Section 9.150. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Tipton Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$13,039,805
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 140,663
Total (Not to exceed 260.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$13,180,468
Section 9.155. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Western Reception, Diagnostic and Correctional Center at St.
Joseph, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
institutions and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$25,097,440
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 141,315
Total (Not to exceed 487.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$25,238,755
Section 9.160. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Maryville Treatment Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$9,316,205
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 88,929
Total (Not to exceed 185.58 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$9,405,134
Section 9.165. To the Department of Corrections

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 13
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Crossroads Correctional Center at Cameron, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$21,131,466
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 149,455
Total (Not to exceed 421.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$21,280,921
Section 9.170. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Northeast Correctional Center at Bowling Green, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$23,266,135
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 136,150
Total (Not to exceed 506.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$23,402,285
Section 9.175. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Eastern Reception, Diagnostic, and Correctional Center at Bonne
Terre, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
institutions and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$28,970,167
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 142,926
Total (Not to exceed 574.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$29,113,093
Section 9.180. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the South Central Correctional Center at Licking, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 14
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$22,937,527
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 141,072
Total (Not to exceed 417.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$23,078,599
Section 9.185. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Southeast Correctional Center at Charleston, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$20,413,344
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 146,913
Total (Not to exceed 396.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$20,560,257
Section 9.190. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between sections, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,799,146
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 39,503
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 42.15 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,838,649
Section 9.195. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services
For contractual services for offender physical and mental health care, and
should unexpended funds be available, for a study to assess the
feasibility to convert the closed Western Missouri Correctional
Center into a Mental Health Restoration and Evaluation Center
and to provide a comprehensive long-range facilities plan for the
Department of Corrections, provided not more than two million
($2,000,000) shall be expended for such study, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between sections, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$222,964,589

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 15
For a pilot program to ensure the availability and use of all medication-
assisted treatment products approved by the FDA to treat opioid
use disorder, including but not limited to those specified in
Section 191.1165, RSMo, in conjunction with treatment for
incarcerated offenders
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 7,900,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$230,864,589
Section 9.200. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services
For substance use and recovery services, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between sections, and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,273,381
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,935,785
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................9,209,166
Personal Service ..................................................................................................120,231
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,635,341
From Corrections Reinvestment Fund (1368) .............................................................1,755,572
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................1,907,086
From Correctional Substance Abuse Earnings Fund (1853) ............................... 40,000
Total (Not to exceed 49.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$12,911,824
Section 9.205. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services
For toxicology testing, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between sections, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$787,330
Section 9.210. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services
For offender education provided one hundred percent (100%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 16
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between sections and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$10,069,259
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................10,069,260
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 1,100,000
Total (Not to exceed 198.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$11,169,260
Section 9.215. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services
For Missouri Correctional Enterprises, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$7,366,762
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 19,300,604
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) (Not to exceed 163.88
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$26,667,366
Section 9.220. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$84,085,766
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,136,118
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................88,221,884
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Fund (1540) ............................................................................................4,336,924
For transfers and refunds set-off against debts as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 3,600,000
Total (Not to exceed 1,686.81 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$99,483,808

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 17
Section 9.225. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For the Transition Center of St. Louis, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 104.36 F.T.E.) ........................$5,092,792
Section 9.230. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For the Transition Center of Kansas City, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,896,780
From Inmate Fund (1540) .................................................................................... 64,592
Total (Not to exceed 100.18 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$4,961,372
Section 9.235. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For the Command Center, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between sections, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service ................................................................................................$757,428
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,900
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 16.40 F.T.E.) .............................$762,328
Section 9.240. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For low-risk offender supervision, provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 9.240 and 9.245
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Fund (1540) ..........................................................................................$1,700,000
Section 9.245. To the Department of Corrections

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 18
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For electronic monitoring, provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 9.240 and 9.245
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Fund (1540) ..........................................................................................$3,080,289
Section 9.250. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For community supervision centers, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,774,968
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 529,439
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 143.92 F.T.E.) ........................$7,304,407
Section 9.255. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For Parole Board operations, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between sections, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,404,458
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 86,205
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 35.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,490,663
Section 9.260. To the Department of Corrections
For paying an amount in aid to the counties that is the net amount of costs
in criminal cases, transportation of convicted criminals to the
state penitentiaries, housing, costs for reimbursement of the
expenses associated with extradition, less the amount of unpaid
city or county liability to furnish public defender office space and
utility services pursuant to Section 600.040, RSMo, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between reimbursements to
county jails, certificates of delivery, and extradition payments
For Reimbursements to County Jails at the rate of $24.95 per Prisoner
per day ..........................................................................................................$51,707,544

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 19
For Certificates of Delivery .........................................................................................1,960,000
For Extradition Payments .................................................................................... 1,960,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$55,627,544
Section 9.265. To the Department of Corrections
For payments to counties and cities that operate jails or detention
facilities eligible for reimbursement under Section 221.105,
RSMo, for the provision of appropriate feminine hygiene
products to prisoners. Funds shall be distributed by the
department in one annual payment to each county/city based on
each county's/city's percent of the total population in eligible
counties/cities as determined by the most recent census
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$240,000
Section 9.270. To the Department of Corrections
For costs associated with offender communication security measures.
Capability shall include continuous monitoring and
investigations of offender communications using AI-powered
platform to transcribe, analyze, and monitor inmate phone
communications and shall allow corrections personnel to search
transcripts by keywords, names, dates, and phone numbers while
supporting total data ingestion and near real-time processing for
high volumes of communications, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,000,000
Section 9.275. To the Department of Corrections
For operating department institutional canteens for offender use and
benefit. Per Section 217.195 RSMo, fund expenditures are solely
to improve offender recreational, religious, or educational
services, and for canteen cash flow and operating expenses
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ..........................................................................$29,813,549
Section 9.280. To the Department of Corrections
For the costs of settlement and other expenses related to resolution of the
Hootselle, et al. v. Missouri Department of Corrections, Case No.
12AC-CC00518-01
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2009 20
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,732,650
Section 9.285. To the Department of Corrections
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
PART 2
Section 9.2000. To the Department of Corrections
In reference to Section 9.195 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended for any cross-sex hormones, or
gender transition surgery undertaken for the purpose of any
gender transition.
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund (10,027.85 F.T.E.) ............................................................$967,638,963
Federal Funds (43.00 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................6,214,441
Other Funds (223.88 F.T.E.) ............................................................................... 87,151,126
Total (10,294.73 F.T.E.) .....................................................................................$1,061,004,530
